Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
81-12,139
Department; contract authorized.

The department
may enter into a contract with a Nebraska-based nonprofit entity, small business
development center, community development corporation, Nebraska-based institution
of higher education, chamber of commerce, or regional development district
for the purpose of carrying out the Small Business Innovation Act.

Laws 2011, LB345, § 4.
May 25, 2011December 31, 2013